test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_saaha_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  Noun - kaastâ:
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Nom: kaastâ
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Gen: kaastâ
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Acc: kaastâ
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Ill: kaastân
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Loc: kaastâst
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Com: kastáin
    kaastâ+N+Sg+Abe: kaˊstâttáá
    kaastâ+N+Ess: kaastân
    kaastâ+N+Par: kaastâd
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Nom: kaastah
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kaastâi, kastâi]
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Acc: kaastâid
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Ill: kastáid
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Loc: kaastâin
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Com: kaˊstâiguin
    kaastâ+N+Pl+Abe: kaˊstâittáá

  Noun - saahâ:
    saahâ+N+Sg+Nom: saahâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Gen: saaṿâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Acc: saaṿâ
    saahâ+N+Sg+Ill: saahân
    saahâ+N+Sg+Loc: saaṿâst
    saahâ+N+Sg+Com: savváin
    saahâ+N+Sg+Abe: saˊṿâttáá
    saahâ+N+Ess: saahân
    saahâ+N+Par: saahâd
    saahâ+N+Pl+Nom: saaṿah
    saahâ+N+Pl+Gen: [saaṿâi, saˊṿâi] 
    saahâ+N+Pl+Acc: saaṿâid
    saahâ+N+Pl+Ill: savváid
    saahâ+N+Pl+Loc: saaṿâin
    saahâ+N+Pl+Com: saˊṿâiguin
    saahâ+N+Pl+Abe: saˊṿâittáá
